src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-oahpa.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software ; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     South Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


!! !!!Adjective affixes

!! This is one of two parallel files containing adjective affixes.
!! The files represent two alternative interpretation of the same data
!! (South Saami adjectives).
!! This file is used for dictionary and icall applications, the alternative file
!! ''adjectives.lexc'' is used for spellchecking.
!! This file is compiled by in
!! langs/sma giving the command ''.configure --with-oahpa''
!! before compiling. The other file (adjectives.lexc) is compiled by default.

! ===========================================
!! !!!Adjectives: Adjectival inflection sublexica
! ===========================================

!! !!Basic adjectival lexica, infl types
! -----------------------------------

!! !even stems
! - - - - -

!! Lexical exceptions


LEXICON A_LDH !!= * __@CODE@__
   +A+Attr: ATTRCONT ;
 +A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1   ;
  +A+Sg+Pl: FINAL1   ;


LEXICON NOERE !!= * __@CODE@__
 :noer   e_E_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :nuerie EVENCOMPONLY   ;
 :nööre  MES            ;
 :nuerie DIMCOMP        ;

LEXICON BUERIE !!= * __@CODE@__
 :buer   ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :buerie EVENCOMPONLY     ;
 :bööre  MES              ;
 :buerie DIMCOMP          ;

LEXICON LEEVLES !!= * __@CODE@__
        :leevle   ATTR_S       ;
 +Use/NG:leevl    PRED_S       ;
 +Use/NG:leevle   EVENCOMP     ;
 +Use/NG:lyövl    es_ES_EVEN   ;
 +Use/NG:lïevl    es_ES_EVEN   ;
 +Use/NG:löövl    es_ES_EVEN   ;
 +Use/NG:lïevle   EVENCOMPONLY ;
 +Use/NG:löövle   MES          ;
 +Use/NG:lïevle   DIMCOMP      ;
        :lyövlehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;

LEXICON SOOKES !!= * __@CODE@__
 :söök    es_ES_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :suekie  EVENCOMPONLY     ;
 :sööke   MES              ;
 :suekie  DIMCOMP          ;
 :sååkehk HKE_ODD_NGCOMP   ;

LEXICON SOOJMES !!= * __@CODE@__
        :sööjme   ATTR_S       ;
 +Use/NG:sööjme   PRED_S       ;
 +Use/NG:sööjme   EVENCOMP     ;
 +Use/NG:seejm    es_ES_EVEN   ;
! :suejme EVENCOMPONLY ; ! finner ikke dok
        :sååjmehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;


LEXICON SMAAVE   !!= * __@CODE@__, both smaave and plaave
 +Use/NG:aav   e_E_EVENNOCOMP  ;
        :aav   e_ES_EVENNOCOMP ; ! LMM says so for plaave
! :aevie EVENCOMPONLY ; ! finner ikke dok
! :aevie MES ; !  finner ikke dok
        :aavie EVENCOMPONLY    ;
        :aavie MES             ;
        :aevie DIMCOMP         ;

LEXICON SNAARE  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :snaar   e_ES_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :snaerie EVENCOMPONLY    ;
 :sneere  MES             ;
 :snaerie DIMCOMP         ;

LEXICON ORRE !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Use/NG:urre EVENCOMPONLY ;
 +Use/NG:urre EVENCOMP     ;
 +Use/NG:urre DIMCOMP      ;
        :orr  e_E_EVEN     ; !comment from Aajege

LEXICON STOERE !!= * __@CODE@__
         :stoer   e_E_EVENNOCOMP ;
! :stoere ATTR_S  ; !finner ikke dok for denne
  +Use/NG:stoerr  e_E_EVENNOCOMP ;
 +Err/Orth:stuerre EVENCOMPONLY   ;
 +Err/Orth:stoerre EVENCOMPONLY   ;
                  STOERE_COMP    ;

!LEXICON STOERE
! :stoer e_E_EVENNOCOMP  ;
! :stoere ATTR_S  ;
! STOERE_COMP ;
!
!LEXICON STOERRE
! :stoerr e_E_EVENNOCOMP  ;
!+Err/Orth:stuerre EVENCOMPONLY ;
!+Err/Orth:stoerre EVENCOMPONLY ;
! STOERE_COMP ;

LEXICON STOERE_COMP !!= * __@CODE@__
         :stuerie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 +Err/Orth:stuerie EVENSUPONLY  ;
         :stööre  MES          ;
         :stuerie DIMCOMP      ;

LEXICON NAAKE !!= * __@CODE@__
 :nåak   e_E_EVEN     ;
 :vïerre EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :vearra EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :vïerre MES          ;
 :vearra MES          ;
 :veerre MES          ;
 :vïerre DIMCOMP      ;
 :vearra DIMCOMP      ;

LEXICON GISSE !!= * __@CODE@__
         :gïss    e_E_EVENNOCOMP ;
         :gissie  EVENCOMPONLY   ;
         :gissie  MES            ;
 +Err/Orth:gïssie  EVENCOMPONLY   ;
 +Err/Orth:gïssie  MES            ;
         :gissie  DIMCOMP        ;
  +Use/NG:gïssege PRED_0         ; ! eller er dette et annet lemma? jfr. -hke og gabtege

LEXICON GAMTE !!= * __@CODE@__
        :te            ATTR_0   ;
        :tege          PRED_0   ;
 +Use/NG:t             eCASE    ;
        :%>%^DISIMPtie EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON GIEVTE !!= * __@CODE@__
 :gïevt  e_E_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :geavte EVENCOMPONLY   ;
 :gievte EVENCOMPONLY   ;
 :gïevte MES            ;
 :gievte DIMCOMP        ;
 :geavte DIMCOMP        ;

LEXICON KRUANA !!= * __@CODE@__
         :kruan  a_A_EVENNOCOMP ;
         :kråane EVENCOMP       ;
  +Use/NG:kruene EVENCOMPONLY   ;
  +Use/NG:kroene EVENSUPONLY    ;
 +Err/Orth:kruane EVENCOMPONLY   ;

LEXICON VEELKES !!= * __@CODE@__
        :veelke   ATTR_S       ;
 +Use/NG:veelke   PRED_S       ;
 +Use/NG:vielkie  EVENCOMPONLY ;
        :vielkie  DIMCOMP      ;
 +Use/NG:veelke   MES          ;
        :vyölkehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;


LEXICON ROOPSES !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Use/NG:reeps    es_ES_EVENNOCOMP ;
        :rööps    es_ES_EVENNOCOMP ;
        :ruepsie  EVENCOMPONLY     ;
        :ruepsie  DIMCOMP          ;
        :rööpse   MES              ;
 +Use/NG:rååpsehk HKE_ODD_NGCOMP   ;

LEXICON SNEEHPES  !!= * __@CODE@__ burde GEEHPES -> SNEEHPES ? ikke dokumentert geehpebe. s_S_ODD  bort?
        :sneehpe   ATTR_S           ; !
 +Use/NG:sneehpe   PRED_S           ; !
 +Use/NG:sneehp    es_ES_EVENNOCOMP ; ! pga sneehpebe
 +Use/NG:sneehpe   EVENCOMP         ; ! pga sneehpebe
 +Use/NG:sneehpe   s_S_ODD          ; ! ikke dokumentert i corp eller LMM
 +Use/NG:snaehpie  EVENCOMPONLY     ;
        :snaehpie  DIMCOMP          ;
        :snååhpehk HKE_ODD_COMP     ;

LEXICON GEEHPES !!= * __@CODE@__
         :geehpes  ODDCASEOBL   ;
         :geehpe   ATTR_S       ;
! :geehp es_ES_EVENNOCOMP  ; !  s_S_ODD  bort?
 +Err/Orth:geehpe   s_S_ODD      ; ! ikke riktig iflg. Aajege, ikke dokumentert i corp eller LMM
  +Use/NG:geahpie  EVENCOMPONLY ; ! -ie- i paradigmet for giehpies
         :geahpie  DIMCOMP      ; ! -ie- i paradigmet for  giehpies
  +Use/NG:geehpe   MES          ;
         :gyöhpehk HKE_ODD_COMP ;
  +Use/NG:geehpe   PRED_S       ;

LEXICON GEERVE !!= * __@CODE@__
        :geerv   e_E_EVEN     ;
 +Use/NG:giervie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 +Use/NG:giervie MES          ;
        :giervie DIMCOMP      ;

LEXICON TJOEVKES !!= * __@CODE@__
 :tjoevke  s_S_ODD      ; ! ODD ikke i LMM, ikke i corp
 :tjuevkie EVENCOMPONLY ;
 :tjuevkie DIMCOMP      ;
 :tjoevke  MES          ;

LEXICON SAETNIES !!= * __@CODE@__
        :saetnies ATTR_0   ;
        :saatnan  PRED_0   ;
 +Use/NG:saatna   PRED_0   ;
        :saatn    aCASEOBL ;

LEXICON SUVHTJIES !!= * __@CODE@__
 :suvhtjies ATTR_0 ;
 :såvhtjan  PRED_0 ;
! :suvhtjiek ODDCOMP ; ! suvhtjiekåbpoe? Im not sure..SJEKK LA: skal denne ha komp?
! :såvhtjak ODDCOMP ; ! såvhtjakåbpoe? Im not sure..SJEKK LA: skal denne ha komp?


LEXICON SAEBRIES  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :såebries ATTR_0    ;
 :såabran  PRED_0    ;
 :såabrak  ODDCOMP   ; ! 4 såabrakåbpoe
 :såebr    ieCASEOBL ;

LEXICON MUJVIES  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :mujvies ATTR_0    ; ! Pred=Substantiv mujvine - måjvan
 :måjvas  ODDCOMP   ;
 :mujv    ieCASEOBL ;


LEXICON STAERIES  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :staerie ATTR_S ;
 :staaran PRED_0 ;

LEXICON GIERIES  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :gierie   ATTR_S    ;
 :gearehke PRED_0    ;
 :gearahk  ODDCOMP   ;
 :gier     ieCASEOBL ;
